Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 2. Licensing Officers.

Collateral references. —

52 Am. Jur. 2d, Marriage, §§ 31-37.

55 C.J.S., Marriage, §§ 27-35.

Sec. 25.05.071.
Persons to issue license.

A licensing officer is the only official who may issue marriage licenses under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Sec. 25.05.080.
Department to furnish forms. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.081.
Marriage commissioners.

The presiding judge in each judicial district may, if the public interest requires, appoint one or more suitable persons as marriage commissioners. The presiding judge shall describe the marriage commissioner’s area of jurisdiction in the order of appointment. A marriage commissioner may, within that jurisdiction, solemnize marriages in the same manner as a district judge or magistrate and may exercise any power, other than the power to issue marriage licenses, necessarily incident to the duties of a marriage commissioner. The clerk of court shall issue to the marriage commissioner a certified copy of the order of appointment and send a copy of it to the bureau.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 79 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 25.05.090.
Department to approve tests, laboratories. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]